Hawaii statutes.
[§482-34] Forum for actions regarding
registration; service on out of state registrants. (a) An action to
require cancellation of a mark registered under this part shall be brought in
circuit court. In an action for cancellation, the director shall not be made a
party to the proceeding but shall be notified of the filing of the complaint by
the clerk of the court in which it is filed and shall have the right to
intervene in the action.

(b) In any action brought against a
registrant that is a nonresident of this State, service may be effected
pursuant to sections 634-35 and 634-36. [L 2001, c 15, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next